Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. Duties of Employer.

Sec. 23.30.045.
Employer’s liability for compensation.

An employer is liable for and shall secure the payment to employees of the compensation payable under AS

23.30.041

,

23.30.050

,

23.30.095

,

23.30.145

, and

23.30.180

—

23.30.215

. If the employer is a subcontractor and fails to secure the payment of compensation to its employees, the contractor is liable for and shall secure the payment of the compensation to employees of the subcontractor. If the employer is a contractor and fails to secure the payment of compensation to its employees or the employees of a subcontractor, the project owner is liable for and shall secure the payment of the compensation to employees of the contractor and employees of a subcontractor, as applicable.

Compensation is payable irrespective of fault as a cause for the injury.

For a person eligible for vocational rehabilitation service under this chapter or AS

23.15.080

who is placed with an employer for service at the request of the rehabilitation administrator or division of vocational rehabilitation to provide on the job training, work readiness, work therapy experience, or work sampling, the liability set out in (a) of this section applies to the state rather than to the employer. However, an employer may elect to assume the liabilities in (a) of this section.

A contract may not be awarded by the state or a home rule or other political subdivision of the state unless the person to whom the contract is to be awarded has submitted to the contracting agency proof, furnished by the insurance carrier, of current coverage by workers’ compensation insurance from an insurance company or association authorized to transact the business of workers’ compensation insurance in this state or proof, furnished by the board, of a current certificate of self-insurance from the board. The person to whom the contract is awarded shall keep the workers’ compensation insurance policy in effect during the life of the contract with the state or political subdivision. If the state or the political subdivision of the state fails to obtain proof of coverage or self-insurance or to protect itself under (e) of this section, and an employee of the contractor is injured during the term of the contract, the state or the political subdivision is liable for workers’ compensation to the employee if the employee is unable to recover from the employer because of the employer’s lack of financial assets. The state or the political subdivision is not liable, however, to the employee for workers’ compensation if the employee can recover from the employer under (a) and (b) of this section.

When a contracting agency of the state or a political subdivision receives notice that the workers’ compensation insurance policy of an employer to whom the agency has awarded a contract has been cancelled due to nonpayment of a premium, without being replaced by a comparable policy, the agency may either terminate the contract with the employer or continue the premium payments on behalf of the employer in order to keep the policy in force during the life of the agency’s contract. If the agency chooses to keep the policy in force, it may deduct its payments from the contract price or bring an action against the employer to recover the amount of the payments. When the contracting agency receives notice that the board has revoked a certificate of self-insurance held by a person to whom a contract has been awarded, the agency may terminate the contract. This subsection does not limit the causes of action or remedies that the state or political subdivision may have against the employer.

In this section,

“contractor” means a person who undertakes by contract performance of certain work for another but does not include a vendor whose primary business is the sale or leasing of tools, equipment, other goods, or property;

“project owner” means a person who, in the course of the person’s business, engages the services of a contractor and who enjoys the beneficial use of the work;

“subcontractor” means a person to whom a contractor sublets all or part of the initial undertaking.

History.

(§ 3 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 166 SLA 1972; am §§ 4, 5 ch 93 SLA 1982; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 80 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (f) of this section was reorganized in 2004 to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An employee who is a resident of Alaska and is employed by an Alaska resident employer, but who is injured in the scope of his employment while on a temporary, emergency job in Canada, is entitled to compensation under the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act, and the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Board has jurisdiction over the case. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 35.

Generally, services voluntarily performed for another are not covered by the Workmen’s Compensation Act. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Volunteer civil defense workers are not covered by the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act because they are not “employees” under that Act. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Sec. 23.30.050.
Employer’s liability despite negligence of a third party.

The liability of an employer for medical treatment is not affected by the fact that the employee was injured through the fault or negligence of a third party not in the same employ, until notice of election to sue has been given as required by AS

23.30.015(a)

or suit has been brought against the third party without giving notice.
The employer has, however, a cause of action against the third party to recover any amounts paid by the employer for the medical treatment in like manner as provided in AS

23.30.015(b)

.

History.

(§ 6(4) ch 193 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.30.055.
Exclusiveness of liability.

The liability of an employer prescribed in AS

23.30.045

is exclusive and in place of all other liability of the employer and any fellow employee to the employee, the employee’s legal representative, husband or wife, parents, dependents, next of kin, and anyone otherwise entitled to recover damages from the employer or fellow employee at law or in admiralty on account of the injury or death. The liability of the employer is exclusive even if the employee’s claim is barred under AS

23.30.022

. However, if an employer fails to secure payment of compensation as required by this chapter, an injured employee or the employee’s legal representative in case death results from the injury may elect to claim compensation under this chapter, or to maintain an action against the employer at law or in admiralty for damages on account of the injury or death. In that action, the defendant may not plead as a defense that the injury was caused by the negligence of a fellow servant, or that the employee assumed the risk of the employment, or that the injury was due to the contributory negligence of the employee. In this section, “employer” includes, in addition to the meaning given in AS

23.30.395

, a person who, under AS

23.30.045

(a), is liable for or potentially liable for securing payment of compensation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1962; am § 11 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 2004)

Opinions of attorney general. —

While it is true that under the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act, employers, including the state, are excluded from admiralty liability, this exclusive liability provision cannot act as a limitation on suits against the state under the federal maritime law once the state has unqualifiedly waived its immunity for negligent torts. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

So much of this section as limits the liability of employers in admiralty must be considered an invalid infringement on the federal jurisdiction. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

All employees on the Alaska ferry system who meet the classification of seamen or members of the crew within the scope of the Jones Act, former 46 U.S.C. § 688, have an exclusive federal remedy within the terms of the Jones Act to the exclusion of the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act, except as to those injuries that occur in a situation of only local concern or fall within the “twilight zone” between local and federal jurisdiction. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

The “twilight zone” between local and federal jurisdiction encompasses all those employments for which a reasonable argument can be made both for and against the application of a state workmen’s compensation law. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

Seamen who come within the federal maritime jurisdiction for tort claims under the Jones Act, former 46 U.S.C. § 688, can waive the federal remedy and elect to proceed under the Workmen’s Compensation Act. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

State ferry employees, who would be classified by their shore duties as longshoremen or harbor workers, are not subject to the Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act, 33 U.S.C. § 901 et seq. 1963Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

Sec. 23.30.060.
Election of direct payment presumed.

An employer is conclusively presumed to have elected to pay compensation directly to employees for injuries sustained arising out of and in the course of the employment according to the provisions of this chapter, until notice in writing of insurance, stating the name and address of the insurance company and the period of insurance, is given to the employee.

The notice shall be posted and kept on the premises of the employer or on the premises where the employer’s operations are being carried on in three conspicuous places, at the office of the employer, at the mess house or boarding house if there is one, and in some conspicuous place on the premises or works. The notice must be substantially in the following form, and the signature shall be witnessed by two witnesses:

Employer’s Notice of Insurance To the employees of the undersigned:
You and each of you are herby notified that the undersigned is insured in the Insurance Company, whose address is and that the period covered by the insurance is in accordance with the terms, conditions and provisions to pay compensation to employees of the undersigned for injuries received as provided in the Act of the State of Alaska, known as the “Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act.” Signed Witness:

Click to view

History.

(§ 34 ch 193 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.30.065.
Employer’s record of injuries.

An employer shall keep a record with respect to an injury to an employee. The record must contain the information of disease, other disability, or death with respect to an injury that the division requires, and must be available to inspection by the division or by a state authority at the times and under the conditions that the department prescribes by regulation.

History.

(§ 27 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 24 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Sec. 23.30.070.
Report of injury to division.

Within 10 days from the date the employer has knowledge of an injury or death or from the date the employer has knowledge of a disease or infection, alleged by the employee or on behalf of the employee to have arisen out of and in the course of the employment, the employer shall file with the division a report setting out

the name, address, and business of the employer;

the name, address, and occupation of the employee;

the cause and nature of the alleged injury or death;

the year, month, day, and hour when and the particular locality where the alleged injury or death occurred; and

the other information that the division may require.

Additional reports with respect to the injury and to the condition of the employee shall be filed by the employer with the division at the times and in the manner that the director prescribes.

A report made under (a) or (b) of this section is not evidence of a fact stated in the report in a proceeding in respect to the injury or death on account of which the report is made.

Filing of the report with the division in a format prescribed by the director, within the time prescribed in (a) or (b) of this section, is compliance with this section.

If the employer or the carrier has been given notice, or the employer, or an agent of the employer in charge of the business in the place where the injury occurred, or the carrier has knowledge of an injury or death of an employee and fails, neglects, or refuses to file a report of it as required by (a) of this section, the limitations in AS

23.30.105(a)

of this chapter do not begin to run against the claim of the injured employee or the employee’s dependents entitled to compensation, or in favor of either the employer or the carrier, until the report has been furnished as required (a) of this section.

An employer who fails or refuses to file a report required of the employer by this section or who fails or refuses to file the report required by (a) of this section within the time required shall, if so required by the board, pay the employee or the legal representative of the employee or other person entitled to compensation by reason of the employee’s injury or death an additional award equal to 20 percent of the amounts that were unpaid when due. The award shall be against either the employer or the insurance carrier, or both.

History.

(§ 28 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1970; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 22, 2018, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “shall file with” for “shall send to” following “the employer”; in (b), substituted “shall be filed by the employer with the division” for shall be sent by the employer to the division” following “condition of the employee”; rewrote (d), which read, “Mailing of the report and a copy to the division in a standard envelope, within the time prescribed in (a) or (b) of this section, is compliance with this section”; in (f) twice substituted “to file a report” for “to send a report” following “or refuses”.

Sec. 23.30.075.
Employer’s liability to pay.

An employer under this chapter, unless exempted, shall either insure and keep insured for the employer’s liability under this chapter in an insurance company or association duly authorized to transact the business of workers’ compensation insurance in this state, or shall furnish the division satisfactory proof of the employer’s financial ability to pay directly the compensation provided for. If an employer elects to pay directly, the board may, in its discretion, require the deposit of an acceptable security, indemnity, or bond to secure the payment of compensation liabilities as they are incurred.

If an employer fails to insure and keep insured employees subject to this chapter or fails to obtain a certificate of self-insurance from the division, upon conviction, the court shall impose a fine of $10,000 and may impose a sentence of imprisonment for not more than one year. If an employer is a corporation, all persons who, at the time of the injury or death, had authority to insure the corporation or apply for a certificate of self-insurance, and the person actively in charge of the business of the corporation shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in this subsection and shall be personally, jointly, and severally liable together with the corporation for the payment of all compensation or other benefits for which the corporation is liable under this chapter if the corporation at that time is not insured or qualified as a self-insurer.

History.

(§ 36 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 46 SLA 1964; am § 12 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Violent Crimes Compensation Board has no right to obtain reimbursement for funds paid to a victim injured on the job from the victim’s employer, where the employer has failed to obtain workers’ compensation insurance and is now bankrupt. AS

18.67.140

limits any subrogation claims to situations in which subrogation is sought against the person who committed the crime.
September 11, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.30.080.
Employer’s failure to insure.

If an employer fails to comply with AS

23.30.075

the employer may not escape liability for personal injury or death sustained by an employee when the injury sustained arises out of and in the usual course of the employment because

the employee assumed the risks inherent to or incidental to or arising out of the employment, or the risks arising from the failure of the employer to provide and maintain a reasonably safe place to work, or the risks arising from the failure of an employer to furnish reasonably safe tools or appliances; or because the employer exercises reasonable care in selecting reasonably competent employees in the business;

the injury was caused by the negligence of a co-employee;

the employee was negligent, unless it appears that the negligence was wilful and with intent to cause the injury or was the result of wilful intoxication on the part of the injured party.

In an action by an employee against an employer for personal injury sustained arising out of and in the course of the employment where the employer has failed to insure or to provide security as required by AS

23.30.075

, it is presumed that the injury to the employee was the first result growing out of the negligence of the employer and that the employer’s negligence was the proximate cause of the injury; the burden of proof rests upon the employer to rebut this presumption of negligence.

The limits of liability do not apply when an action is brought under this section.

If an employer fails to insure or provide security as required by AS

23.30.075

, the board may issue a stop order at the request of the division prohibiting the use of employee labor by the employer until the employer insures or provides security as required by AS

23.30.075

. The failure of an employer to file evidence of compliance as required by AS

23.30.085

creates a rebuttable presumption that the employer has failed to insure or provide security as required by AS 23.30.075. If an employer fails to comply with a stop order issued under this section, the board shall assess a civil penalty of $1,000 a day. The employer may not obtain a public contract with the state or a political subdivision of the state for three years following the violation of the stop order.

If a representative of the department investigates an employer’s failure to file the evidence of compliance required by AS

23.30.085

and, after investigation, there is substantial evidence that the employer failed to insure or provide security as required by AS

23.30.075

, the representative shall inform the employer. The representative may request the director to issue a stop order prohibiting the use of employee labor by the employer until the employer insures or provides security as required by AS

23.30.075

. The director may issue a stop order, without a hearing, based on the representative’s investigation. The director shall dissolve a stop order issued under this subsection upon receipt of substantial evidence that the employer is insured or has provided security as required by AS

23.30.075(a)

. If an employer fails to comply with a stop order issued under this subsection, the division may petition the board to assess a civil penalty. The board may assess a civil penalty of $1,000 a day. An employer who is assessed a penalty under this subsection may not obtain a public contract with the state or a political subdivision of the state for the three years following violation of the stop order.

If an employer fails to insure or provide security as required by AS

23.30.075

, the division may petition the board to assess a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for each employee for each day an employee is employed while the employer failed to insure or provide the security required by AS

23.30.075

. The failure of an employer to file evidence of compliance as required by AS

23.30.085

creates a rebuttable presumption that the employer failed to insure or provide security as required by AS 23.30.075.

If an employer fails to pay a civil penalty order issued under (d), (e), or (f) of this section within seven days after the date of service of the order upon the employer, the director may declare the employer in default. The director shall file a certified copy of the penalty order and declaration of default with the clerk of the superior court. The court shall, upon the filing of the copy of the order and declaration, enter judgment for the amount declared in default if it is in accordance with law. Anytime after a declaration of default, the attorney general shall, when requested to do so by the director, take appropriate action to ensure collection of the defaulted payment. Review of the judgment may be had as provided under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. Final proceedings to execute the judgment may be had by writ of execution.

History.

(§ 38 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 93 SLA 1982; am §§ 29, 30 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 23.30.082.
Workers’ compensation benefits guaranty fund.

The workers’ compensation benefits guaranty fund is established in the general fund to carry out the purposes of this section. The fund is composed of civil penalty payments made by employers under AS

23.30.080

, income earned on investment of the money in the fund, money deposited in the fund by the department, and appropriations to the fund, if any. However, money appropriated to the fund does not lapse. Amounts in the fund may be appropriated for claims against the fund, for expenses directly related to fund operations and claims, and for legal expenses.

Every three months, the Department of Revenue shall provide the division with a statement of the activities of, balances in, interest earned on, and interest returned to the fund.

Subject to the provisions of this section, an employee employed by an employer who fails to meet the requirements of AS

23.30.075

and who fails to pay compensation and benefits due to the employee under this chapter may file a claim for payment by the fund. In order to be eligible for payment, the claim form must be filed within the same time, and in the same manner, as a workers’ compensation claim. The fund may assert the same defenses as an insured employer under this chapter.

If the fund pays benefits to an employee under this section, the fund shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the employee to the amount paid, and the employee shall assign all right, title, and interest in that portion of the employee’s workers’ compensation claim and any recovery under AS

23.30.015

to the fund. Money collected by the division on the claim or recovery shall be deposited in the fund.

If the money deposited in the fund is insufficient at a given time to satisfy a duly authorized claim against the fund, the fund shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the fund and appropriated, satisfy unpaid claims in the order in which the claims were originally filed, without interest.

The division may contract under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) with a person for the person to adjust claims against the fund. The contract may cover one or more claims.

In this section, “fund” means the workers’ compensation benefits guaranty fund.

History.

(§ 31 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 23.30.085.
Duty of employer to file evidence of compliance.

An employer subject to this chapter, unless exempted, shall initially file evidence of compliance with the insurance provisions of this chapter with the division, in the form prescribed by the director. The employer shall also give evidence of compliance within 10 days after the termination of the employer’s insurance by expiration or cancellation. These requirements do not apply to an employer who has certification from the board of the employer’s financial ability to pay compensation directly without insurance.

If an employer fails, refuses, or neglects to comply with the provision of this section, the employer shall be subject to the penalties provided in AS

23.30.070

for failure to report accidents; but nothing in this section may be construed to affect the rights conferred upon an injured employee or the employee’s beneficiaries under this chapter.

History.

(§ 37 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 32 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.090.
Self-insurance certificates.

If an employer has complied with the provisions of this chapter relating to self-insurance and has paid annual service fees assessed under AS

23.05.067

, the board shall issue the employer a certificate that shall remain in force for a period fixed by the board. The board may, upon at least 10 days’ notice and a hearing, revoke a self-insurance certificate upon satisfactory proof that an employer is no longer entitled to it. After revocation, the board may grant a new certificate to an employer, upon the employer’s petition and satisfactory proof of the employer’s financial ability as provided in this chapter. An employer authorized as a self-insurer shall provide claims facilities through its own staffed adjusting facilities located within the state, or independent, licensed, resident adjusters with power to effect settlement within the state.

History.

(§ 39 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 89 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Collateral references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d, Workers’ Compensation, § 465.

100 C.J.S., Workmen’s Compensation, §§ 354-356.

Homeowners’ or personal liability insurance as providing coverage for liability under workmen’s compensation laws. 41 ALR3d 1306.

Sec. 23.30.092.
Volunteer ambulance attendants’, police officers’, firefighters’, and search and rescue personnel’s insurance.

A political subdivision may elect to provide benefits and compensation to its volunteer ambulance attendants, police officers, firefighters, or search and rescue personnel by obtaining insurance that would provide its volunteer ambulance attendants, police officers, firefighters, or search and rescue personnel with benefits and compensation at least equivalent to those conferred upon volunteer ambulance attendants, police officers, firefighters, or search and rescue personnel by this chapter, and the election shall be considered compliance with the coverage and insurance provisions of this chapter. The election shall be made by filing copies of the insurance policy or policies with the commissioner.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1979; am § 5 ch 98 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the terms “police officers” and “fire fighters” were substituted for “policemen,” and “firemen” in this section under §§ 59 and 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Sec. 23.30.095.
Medical treatments, services, and examinations.

The employer shall furnish medical, surgical, and other attendance or treatment, nurse and hospital service, medicine, crutches, and apparatus for the period which the nature of the injury or the process of recovery requires, not exceeding two years from and after the date of injury to the employee. However, if the condition requiring the treatment, apparatus, or medicine is a latent one, the two-year period runs from the time the employee has knowledge of the nature of the employee’s disability and its relationship to the employment and after disablement. It shall be additionally provided that, if continued treatment or care or both beyond the two-year period is indicated, the injured employee has the right of review by the board. The board may authorize continued treatment or care or both as the process of recovery may require. When medical care is required, the injured employee may designate a licensed physician to provide all medical and related benefits. The employee may not make more than one change in the employee’s choice of attending physician without the written consent of the employer. Referral to a specialist by the employee’s attending physician is not considered a change in physicians. Upon procuring the services of a physician, the injured employee shall give proper notification of the selection to the employer within a reasonable time after first being treated. Notice of a change in the attending physician shall be given before the change.

If the employee is unable to designate a physician and the emergency nature of the injury requires immediate medical care, or if the employee does not desire to designate a physician and so advises the employer, the employer shall designate the physician. Designation under this subsection, however, does not prevent the employee from subsequently designating a physician for continuance of required medical care.

A claim for medical or surgical treatment, or treatment requiring continuing and multiple treatments of a similar nature, is not valid and enforceable against the employer unless, within 14 days following treatment, the physician or health care provider giving the treatment or the employee receiving it furnishes to the employer and the board notice of the injury and treatment, preferably on a form prescribed by the board. The board shall, however, excuse the failure to furnish notice within 14 days when it finds it to be in the interest of justice to do so, and it may, upon application by a party in interest, make an award for the reasonable value of the medical or surgical treatment so obtained by the employee. When a claim is made for a course of treatment requiring continuing and multiple treatments of a similar nature, in addition to the notice, the physician or health care provider shall furnish a written treatment plan if the course of treatment will require more frequent outpatient visits than the standard treatment frequency for the nature and degree of the injury and the type of treatments. The treatment plan shall be furnished to the employee and the employer within 14 days after treatment begins. The treatment plan must include objectives, modalities, frequency of treatments, and reasons for the frequency of treatments. If the treatment plan is not furnished as required under this subsection, neither the employer nor the employee may be required to pay for treatments that exceed the frequency standard. The board shall adopt regulations establishing standards for frequency of treatment.

If at any time during the period the employee unreasonably refuses to submit to medical or surgical treatment, the board may by order suspend the payment of further compensation while the refusal continues, and no compensation may be paid at any time during the period of suspension, unless the circumstances justified the refusal.

The employee shall, after an injury, at reasonable times during the continuance of the disability, if requested by the employer or when ordered by the board, submit to an examination by a physician or surgeon of the employer’s choice authorized to practice medicine under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the examination occurs, furnished and paid for by the employer. The employer may not make more than one change in the employer’s choice of a physician or surgeon without the written consent of the employee. Referral to a specialist by the employer’s physician is not considered a change in physicians. An examination requested by the employer not less than 14 days after injury, and every 60 days thereafter, shall be presumed to be reasonable, and the employee shall submit to the examination without further request or order by the board. Unless medically appropriate, the physician shall use existing diagnostic data to complete the examination. Facts relative to the injury or claim communicated to or otherwise learned by a physician or surgeon who may have attended or examined the employee, or who may have been present at an examination are not privileged, either in the hearings provided for in this chapter or an action to recover damages against an employer who is subject to the compensation provisions of this chapter. If an employee refuses to submit to an examination provided for in this section, the employee’s rights to compensation shall be suspended until the obstruction or refusal ceases, and the employee’s compensation during the period of suspension may, in the discretion of the board or the court determining an action brought for the recovery of damages under this chapter, be forfeited. The board in any case of death may require an autopsy at the expense of the party requesting the autopsy. An autopsy may not be held without notice first being given to the widow or widower or next of kin if they reside in the state or their whereabouts can be reasonably ascertained, of the time and place of the autopsy and reasonable time and opportunity given the widow or widower or next of kin to have a representative present to witness the autopsy. If adequate notice is not given, the findings from the autopsy may be suppressed on motion made to the board or to the superior court, as the case may be.

[Repealed, § 74 ch 10 FSSLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 27 ch 93 SLA 1982.]

Upon the filing with the division by a party in interest of a claim or other pleading, all parties to the proceeding must immediately, or in any event within five days after service of the pleading, send to the division the original signed reports of all physicians relating to the proceedings that they may have in their possession or under their control, and copies of the reports shall be served by the party immediately on any adverse party. There is a continuing duty on all parties to file and serve all the reports during the pendency of the proceeding.

Interference by a person with the selection by an injured employee of an authorized physician to treat the employee, or the improper influencing or attempt by a person to influence a medical opinion of a physician who has treated or examined an injured employee, is a misdemeanor.

The commissioner shall appoint a medical services review committee to assist and advise the department and the board in matters involving the appropriateness, necessity, and cost of medical and related services provided under this chapter. The medical services review committee shall consist of nine members to be appointed by the commissioner as follows:

one member who is a member of the Alaska State Medical Association;

one member who is a member of the Alaska Chiropractic Society;

one member who is a member of the Alaska State Hospital and Nursing Home Association;

one member who is a health care provider, as defined in AS

09.55.560

;

four public members who are not within the definition of “health care provider” in AS

09.55.560

; and

one member who is the designee of the commissioner and who shall serve as chair.

In the event of a medical dispute regarding determinations of causation, medical stability, ability to enter a reemployment plan, degree of impairment, functional capacity, the amount and efficacy of the continuance of or necessity of treatment, or compensability between the employee’s attending physician and the employer’s independent medical evaluation, the board may require that a second independent medical evaluation be conducted by a physician or physicians selected by the board from a list established and maintained by the board. The cost of an examination and medical report shall be paid by the employer. The report of an independent medical examiner shall be furnished to the board and to the parties within 14 days after the examination is concluded. A person may not seek damages from an independent medical examiner caused by the rendering of an opinion or providing testimony under this subsection, except in the event of fraud or gross incompetence.

[Repealed, § 74 ch 10 FSSLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 74 ch 10 FSSLA 2005.]

A generic drug product must be used when dispensing a drug product to an employee under this chapter unless the prescribing physician provides justification in writing explaining the medical necessity for the name-brand drug product. The department, by regulation, shall establish a preferred drug list and a procedure for establishing medical necessity to depart from the list and to use a name-brand drug product. In this subsection, “generic drug product” has the meaning given the term “equivalent drug product” in AS

08.80.480

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an employer is not liable for palliative care after the date of medical stability unless the palliative care is reasonable and necessary (1) to enable the employee to continue in the employee’s employment at the time of treatment, (2) to enable the employee to continue to participate in an approved reemployment plan, or (3) to relieve chronic debilitating pain. A claim for palliative care is not valid and enforceable unless it is accompanied by a certification of the attending physician that the palliative care meets the requirements of this subsection. A claim for palliative care is subject to the requirements of (c) — (n) of this section. If a claim for palliative care is controverted by the employer, the board may require an evaluation under (k) of this section regarding the disputed palliative care. A claim for palliative care may be heard by the board under AS

23.30.110

.

History.

(§ 6(1) (2) ch 193 SLA 1959; § 6(3), (5) ch 193 SLA 1959; § 6(6) ch 193 SLA 1959; am §§ 2, 3 ch 42 SLA 1962; added by § 4 ch 42 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1963; am § 86 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 7 — 9, 27 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1984; am §§ 13 — 18 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1995; am §§ 8, 9 ch 105 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 2002; am §§ 33 — 35, 74 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For additional duties of the medical services review committee, the membership of which is altered by the 2005 amendment of (j) of this section, see § 82, ch. 10, FSSLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.